Washington statutes.
RCW 42.24.130

Advancements for travel expenses—Revolving fund.

The legislative body of a municipal corporation or political subdivision wishing to make advance payments of travel expenses to officials and employees, as provided in RCW 42.24.120 through 42.24.160, will establish, in the manner that local legislation is officially enacted, a revolving fund to be used solely for the purpose of making advance payments of travel expenses. The revolving fund will be maintained in a bank as a checking account and advances to officials or employees will be by check. The fund will be replenished by warrant.

[ 1969 c 74 s 2.]